New Jersey, session 221, S2547.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A public agency that is receiving State funds for the purpose of public work shall post on its main website for public inspection an accounting of how much of those funds were used for public work contracts in which the public agency contracted with businesses owned by minorities, women, and veterans.  The accounting shall also provide how much of those funds were used in public work contracts in which the public agency contracted with other businesses that are not owned by minorities, women, or veterans.  The accounting required to be posted on the main website of the public agency pursuant to this section shall be updated monthly. Whenever a public agency does not maintain a website, the information shall be forwarded by the public agency to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development and posted on that departments main website, which shall be updated monthly. b.    Each public agency shall forward the information required by this section to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development by the first day of each month, and the department shall, on an annual basis, beginning one year following the effective date of this act, submit to the Governor, and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), a report that summarizes each public agencys use of State funds for public work and how much of those funds were used for contracts with businesses owned by minorities, women, and veterans. c.     As used in this section: Public agency means any of the principal departments in the Executive Branch of State Government, and any division, board, bureau, office, commission or other instrumentality within or created by such department; the Legislature of the State and any office, board, bureau or commission within or created by the Legislative Branch; and any independent State authority, commission, instrumentality or agency, including any public institution of higher education.  The term also means any political subdivision of the State or combination of political subdivisions, and any division, board, bureau, office, commission or other instrumentality within or created by a political subdivision of the State or combination of political subdivisions, and any independent authority, commission, instrumentality or agency created by a political subdivision or combination of political subdivisions. Public work means public work as defined in section 2 of P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.26) and which is subject to the provisions of P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.). Public work shall not include the provision of goods or products. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.